Hawaii statutes.
§571-84.6 Minor law violators; proceedings
and records not confidential. (a) As used in this section:

"Legal record" means petitions,
complaints, motions, and other papers filed in any case; transcripts of
testimony taken by the court; and findings, judgments, orders, decrees, and
other papers and adjudication data, other than social records, filed in
proceedings before the court.

"Social record" means those social
and clinical studies, reports, or examinations prepared in any case pursuant to
this chapter.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law to the
contrary, in any proceeding in which a minor age fourteen years of age or older
has been adjudicated by the court under section 571-11(1) for an act that if
committed by an adult would:

(1) Be murder in the first degree or second degree or
attempted murder in the first degree;

(2) Result in serious bodily injury to or death of a
victim;

(3) Be a class A felony; or

(4) Be a felony and the minor has more than one prior
adjudication for acts that would constitute felonies if committed by an adult,

all legal records related to the above stated
proceeding shall be open for public inspection, unless the administrative judge
of the family court or the judge's designee finds in writing that there are
significant and compelling circumstances peculiar to the case of such a nature
that public inspection would be inconsistent with or defeat the express purpose
of this section. All social records shall be kept confidential except as
provided in section 571-84.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law to the
contrary, in any case in which a minor age sixteen years of age or older comes
within section 571-11(1) is taken into custody for an act that if committed by
an adult would:

(1) Be murder in the first degree or second degree or
attempted murder in the first degree;

(2) Result in serious bodily injury to or death of a
victim;

(3) Be a class A felony and the minor has one or more
prior adjudications for an act that would constitute a felony if committed by
an adult; or

(4) Be a class B or C felony and the minor has more
than one prior adjudication for acts that would constitute felonies if
committed by an adult,

all legal proceedings related to the above stated
case shall be open to the public unless the administrative judge of the family
court or the judge's designee finds in writing that there are significant and
compelling circumstances peculiar to the case of such a nature that an open
proceeding would be inconsistent with or defeat the express purpose of this
section. [L 1997, c 317, §2; am L 1999, c 139, §3]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next